Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3224.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:- 
"Section 29. Battery Energy Storage Facility Buffer Zones. 
(a) Definitions. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings: 
"Battery storage facility"-a facility that uses batteries to store and distribute electrical 
energy. 
"Buffer zone"- a designated distance from certain areas within which battery energy 
storage facilities shall not be constructed or operated. 
"Ecologically protected area"- any land designated under state or federal law as a 
protected environmental zone, including wetlands, wildlife reserves, and conservation areas. 

of 3 12  "Populated area"- any residentially zoned area, school, hospital, or other location with 
high human occupancy. 
(b) Buffer Zone Requirements- (1) No battery storage facility shall be constructed or 
operated within 2000 feet of a populated area. (2) No battery storage facility shall be constructed 
or operated within 3,000 feet of an ecologically protected area. (3) The Department of 
Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Department of Fire Services, may adjust 
buffer distances based on facility size, battery chemistry, and risk assessment. 
(c) Fire Mitigation and Emergency Preparedness- (1) All potential battery storage 
facilities shall submit a fire mitigation and emergency response plan to the Department of Fire 
Services and the local fire department before starting building. (2) Facilities utilizing lithium-ion 
or similarly volatile battery chemistries shall install fire suppression systems in accordance with 
regulations set forth by the Department of Fire Services. 
(d) Environmental Protection Measures- (1) Facilities shall implement groundwater and 
soil contamination prevention measures, including secondary containment and spill response 
plans. (2) The Department of Environmental Protection shall establish guidelines for monitoring 
and mitigating environmental risks posed by battery storage facilities. 
(e) Enforcement and Penalties- (1) The Department of Environmental Protection shall 
have the authority to enforce this section and may impose fines of up to $50,000 per violation for 
noncompliance. (2) Any facility found to be in violation of this section shall be subject to 
suspension of operating permits until compliance is achieved." 
SECTION 2. Chapter 148 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following new section:- 

of 3 34  "Section 61. Battery Storage Facility Fire Safety Standards. 
The State Fire Marshal, in coordination with the Department of Environmental 
Protection, shall establish safety and fire prevention standards specific to battery energy storage 
facilities, including but not limited to: fire suppression and containment requirements, 
emergency response protocols, and mandatory inspections and risk assessments at regular 
intervals." 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.